Washington statutes.
RCW 41.14.010

Declaration of purpose.

The general purpose of this chapter is to establish a merit system of employment for county deputy sheriffs and other employees of the office of county sheriff, thereby raising the standards and efficiency of such offices and law enforcement in general.

[ 1987 c 251 s 1; 1985 c 429 s 3; 1959 c 1 s 1 (Initiative Measure No. 23, approved November 4, 1958).]